Hawaii statutes.
§201H-97 Housing loan programs; procedures
and requirements. (a) The corporation shall establish procedures for:

(1) The making of advance commitments to purchase and
the purchasing of eligible loans, eligible improvement loans, or eligible
project loans to be made by mortgage lenders by auction, invitation of lenders,
or negotiation; and

(2) Loan applications made through mortgage lenders to
eligible borrowers or qualified sponsors.

(b) The corporation shall establish standards
and requirements for:

(1) The allocation of loans to mortgage lenders;

(2) The allocation of funds to purchase existing
loans from mortgage lenders;

(3) The making of advance commitments and allocation
of funds to purchase eligible loans, eligible improvement loans, or eligible
project loans from mortgage lenders; and

(4) The participation by mortgage lenders as
originators and processors of eligible loans, eligible improvement loans, or
eligible project loans on behalf of the corporation.

(c) The standards and requirements for the
allocation of funds to mortgage lenders shall be adopted by the corporation and
shall be designed to include the maximum number of qualified mortgage lenders
as participants in the housing loan programs. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L
2013, c 135, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next